Wisconsin, session 2025, SB574.
do enact as follows:SB574,11Section 1. 20.435 (1) (en) of the statutes is created to read:SB574,2,4220.435 (1) (en) WIC program benefits; federal appropriation lapse. A sum 3sufficient for benefits under s. 253.06 as required under 2025 Wisconsin Act .... (this 4act), section 3 (1).SB574,25Section 2. 20.435 (1) (en) of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act 6.... (this act), is repealed.SB574,37Section 3. Nonstatutory provisions.SB574,2,138(1) Until the enactment of federal legislation that provides funding under 24 9USC 1786, the department of health services shall, notwithstanding s. 253.06 (2), 10continue to provide benefits to participants in the supplemental food program for 11women, infants and children under s. 253.06 at the level the department provided 12the benefits immediately prior to the federal lapse in appropriations that began on 13October 1, 2025.SB574,414Section 4. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the day after 15publication, except as follows:SB574,2,1616(1) The repeal of s. 20.435 (1) (en) takes effect on October 1, 2026.SB574,2,1717